Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.025

Regulating beer—Existing comprehensive scheme—Applicable laws.

The history, economy, culture, and future of Washington state's agriculture involve the beer industry. In order to develop and promote beer as part of an existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those products, the legislature declares that:

(1) It is vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that beer produced in Washington state be properly promoted;

(2) It is in the overriding public interest that support for the Washington beer industry be clearly expressed and that beer be promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the production of beer;

(c) Increase the knowledge of the qualities and value of Washington's beer; and

(d) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of beer;

(3) This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state to protect the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state; and

(4) The production and marketing of beer is a highly regulated industry and this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulated industry. Other laws applicable to the beer industry include:

(a) The organic products act, chapter 15.86 RCW;

(b) The food safety and security act under chapter 15.130 RCW;

(c) The wholesale distributors and suppliers of malt beverages, chapter 19.126 RCW;

(d) Weights and measures, chapter 19.94 RCW;

(e) Title 66 RCW, alcoholic beverage control;

(f) 21 C.F.R. as it relates to general manufacturing practices, food labeling, food standards, food additives, and pesticide tolerances;

(g) Chapter 69.07 RCW, Washington food processing act;

(h) 27 U.S.C. Secs. 201 through 211, 213 through 219a, and 122A;

(i) 27 C.F.R. Parts 1, 6, 9, 10, 12, 16, 240, 251, and 252; and

(j) Rules under Title 314 WAC.

[ 2018 c 236 s 709; 2011 c 103 s 31; 2006 c 330 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.